Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.310

Transfer of system from municipal corporation to county—Authorized.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.94.310 through 36.94.350 a municipal corporation may transfer to the county within which all of its territory lies, all or part of the property constituting its system of sewerage, system of water or combined water and sewerage system, together with any of its other real or personal property used or useful in connection with the operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, extension, or financing of that system, and the county may acquire such property on such terms as may be mutually agreed upon by the governing body of the municipal corporation and the legislative authority of the county, and approved by the superior court for such county.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 188 s 7.]